District of Columbia statutes.
21-2059

Effect of acceptance of appointment.

By accepting appointment, a conservator submits personally to the jurisdiction of the court in any proceeding relating to the estate that may be instituted by any interested person. Notice of any proceeding shall be delivered to the conservator or mailed, by registered or certified mail, to the address as listed in the petition for appointment or as reported to the court and to the address as then known to the petitioner, except where the conservator resides in a foreign jurisdiction in which case notice shall be made to the court.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 2(a), 34 DCR 632

History

1981 Ed., § 21-2059.

Prior Codifications

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 2-312 of the Uniform Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Act (1982 Act).

Editor's Notes